District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.90

Inability to carry out duties as Attorney General.

(a)

(1)

If the Attorney General for the District of Columbia is temporarily unable or unavailable to carry out the duties of the office, the Chief Deputy Attorney General shall serve as acting Attorney General as of the date that notice of such disability or unavailability is provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection and until the date that notice of resolution of the disability is provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection.

(2)

Upon determining that he or she is temporarily unable or unavailable to carry out the duties of the office, the Attorney General shall provide written notice of the disability to the Chief Deputy Attorney General. If the Attorney General is incapable of providing the notice, the Mayor shall provide the notice.

(3)

Upon determining that the disability or unavailability under paragraph (1) of this subsection has been resolved, the Attorney General shall provide written notice to the acting Attorney General that the Attorney General is able to carry out the duties of the office. The Attorney General shall reassume the position as of the date of the written notice.

(b)

This section shall apply upon the election of an Attorney General for the District of Columbia pursuant to § 1-204.35.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 121, 57 DCR 3012

History